District of Columbia statutes.
50-1209

Entry of lien or assignment where certificate is not available; Recorder to obtain certificate.

Whenever it is desired to enter a lien or an assignment upon a certificate and such certificate is not available, upon delivery to the Recorder of the instrument or assignment the Recorder shall demand that the person possessing the certificate surrender it for the purpose of entering thereon the lien or the assignment and upon surrender of the certificate the Recorder shall perform the same acts as in cases where the certificate was presented with the instrument. This section shall not be deemed to affect the priority given under § 50-1203(3) to a lien where the instrument is presented together with the certificate.

History

July 2, 1940, 54 Stat. 739, ch. 527, § 9

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-1009.
1973 Ed., § 40-709.